src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n5-norm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - käynti: # 7 x contlex sg par -- kontrollerad av Elina
    käynti+N+Sg+Nom: käynti
    käynti+N+Sg+Gen: käynin
    käynti+N+Sg+Par: käyntiä
    käynti+N+Sg+Tra: käyniksi
    käynti+N+Sg+Abe: käynittä
    käynti+N+Sg+Ine: käynissä
    käynti+N+Sg+Ela: käynistä
    käynti+N+Sg+Ill: käynthiin
    käynti+N+Sg+Ade: käynilä
    käynti+N+Sg+Abl: käyniltä
    käynti+N+Sg+All: käynile
    käynti+N+Sg+Ess: käyntinä
    käynti+N+Pl+Nom: käynit
    käynti+N+Pl+Gen: [käynitten, käyntien]
    käynti+N+Pl+Par: [käyntejä, käyntiä]
    käynti+N+Pl+Tra: käyneiksi
    käynti+N+Pl+Abe: käyneittä
    käynti+N+Pl+Ine: käyneissä
    käynti+N+Pl+Ela: käyneistä
    käynti+N+Pl+Ill: käynthein
    käynti+N+Pl+Ade: käyneilä
    käynti+N+Pl+Abl: käyneiltä
    käynti+N+Pl+All: käyneile
    käynti+N+Pl+Ess: käynteinä
